Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4907
Acts of agent; how treated; examination authority.

The acts of the managing general agent are considered to be the acts of the insurer on whose behalf it is acting. A managing general agent may be examined by the department as if it were the insurer.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 118;

Laws 2006, LB 875, § 11.